Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3714
Motor club; director; issue cease and desist order; revoke or suspend certificate; grounds; hearing.

The director may order the club to cease and desist or may revoke, suspend, or refuse to continue the certificate of authority of a club whenever, after a hearing and for cause shown, he or she determines that any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The club has violated or failed to comply with any provision of the Motor Club Services Act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under such act;

(2) The club has obtained a certificate of authority through willful misrepresentation or fraud;

(3) The club has engaged in fraudulent or dishonest practices;

(4) The club has willfully, orally or in writing, misrepresented the terms, benefits, privileges, and provisions of any motor club service contract issued or to be issued by it or any other club;

(5) The club is unable to meet its obligations as determined by generally accepted accounting principles; or

(6) The club has refused without just cause to submit relevant information to the director with respect to the motor club services within this state after it has received notice of an alleged occurrence of any of the actions in subdivisions (1) through (5) of this section.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 14;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 238.